California statutes. Water Code
When a decree has been entered, any claimant who has failed to appear and submit proof of his claim as provided in this chapter shall be barred and estopped from subsequently asserting any rights theretofore acquired upon the stream system embraced in the proceedings, and shall be held to have forfeited all rights to water theretofore claimed by him on the stream system, other than as provided in the decree, unless entitled to relief under the laws of this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Intervention [2780. - 2783.]

2780.

Any claimant who, prior to entry of the order of determination by the board, had no actual knowledge or notice of the pendency of the proceedings may, at least 10 days prior to the date set for hearing by the court or within such further time prior to the decree as the court may allow, intervene in the proceedings by filing with the court an exception to the order of determination and a proof of claim which shall contain all the matters required by this chapter of claimants who have been served with notice of the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

2781.

Upon filing his exception and proof of claim, the intervenor shall make application to the court for an order prescribing the time and manner of service of the exception and proof upon other claimants and the time within which contests of the proof may be filed with the court and served upon the intervenor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

2782.

After expiration of the time fixed by the court for filing contests, the court shall proceed to hear and determine the exception and proof of intervenor and any contest thereto in accordance as near as may be with Article 9 (commencing with Section 2750).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

2783.

The court may refer the matter for such further evidence to be taken by the board as the court may direct, and may require a further determination by the board, in which event the board shall be entitled to reimbursement for expenses incurred by it in the manner provided in Article 13 (commencing with Section 2850) of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 53.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Proceedings when Appropriation Incomplete at Time of Determination [2801. - 2820.]

2801.

All persons claiming rights under an incomplete appropriation, when notified as provided in this chapter, shall appear and submit their proofs of claim in accordance with this chapter, or they shall be deemed and held to be in default and to have abandoned or to have no right, title, or interest in or to the water of the stream system, other than as the person may be found to be entitled by the board based on available information and data.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2802.

In determining rights based on an incomplete appropriation initiated according to law prior to December 19, 1914, and since prosecuted with reasonable diligence in accordance with Section 1416 of the Civil Code, the board shall prescribe such reasonable time for the completion of the appropriation and the application of the water to a beneficial use as will enable the claimant acting in good faith and with due diligence to complete the appropriation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

2803.

The order of determination shall provide that within the time prescribed for completion of the appropriation, or such further time as the court may allow, the claimant shall submit to the court proof of completion and the amount of water actually applied to beneficial use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

2806.

The court shall have authority to thereafter hear and determine proof offered as to the completion of any such right.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2807.

Time for completion may be extended from time to time by the court upon motion made prior to the expiration of the limit of time fixed therefor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2808.

Notice of motion for an extension of time for completion shall be filed not more than 90 days prior to the expiration of the time limit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2809.

The clerk of the court shall post notice of hearing of the motion at the courthouse where the hearing is to be held and at least 10 days prior to the hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2810.

The court may refer the matter of the motion to the board for its report and recommendation thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

2811.

Upon receipt of the report and recommendation of the board or, if the board fails to file its report and recommendations within 90 days after the reference, upon the expiration of that period, the court shall grant such an extension of time as there is, in its discretion, good and sufficient cause for, or shall deny the motion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2812.

In event of denial of a motion for the extension of time for completion the applicant may within 10 days after notice by the clerk of the denial, file notice of intention to offer proof of completion.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2813.

Any claimant desiring to offer proof of completion shall file a notice of intention to offer such proof with the clerk of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2814.

The clerk shall post notice of the time for hearing the proof at the courthouse where the hearing is to be held and at least 10 days prior to the hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2815.

Upon submission of proof of completion after entry of the decree of the court, the court shall enter a supplemental decree determining the right before it and in event of failure, after entry of the decree of the court, to submit proof within the time allowed or to move for and secure an extension of time to do so the court shall enter a supplemental decree denying the right involved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2816.

All persons claiming rights under incomplete appropriations who fail to complete their appropriations within the limit of time fixed by the board in its order of determination, or within such further time granted upon motion made prior to the expiration of the time limit as the court finds equitable and just, shall be deemed to have abandoned their rights of appropriation insofar as the same remain incomplete, and such appropriators shall be deemed and held to have no right, title or interest in or to the water of the stream system insofar as their appropriations have not been completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2817.

Appeals from any action of the court under this article may be taken by the board or any party in interest in the same manner and with the same effect as in the civil cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2818.

This article shall not be construed to confer any rights of appropriation upon parties who shall have abandoned their appropriations or failed to use due diligence in the application of the water to a beneficial use and in the completion of their appropriations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2819.

Incomplete appropriations initiated by application under the provisions of the Water Commission Act or this code shall be included in the decree but shall continue to be administered by the board as in other cases. Upon issuance of a license by the board and completion of court review of the board’s action under Article 3 (commencing with Section 1126) of Chapter 4 of Part 1, if court review is sought, and upon motion of the licensee or the board, the court shall enter a supplemental decree confirming the right in accordance with the license. Any change authorized by the board pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1700), Part 2, of this division, shall in like manner be the subject of a supplemental decree.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 659, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2820.

After revocation by the board of a permit or license relating to a right included in the decree and upon completion of court review of the board’s action under Article 3 (commencing with Section 1126) of Chapter 4 of Part 1, if court review is sought, the court shall, upon motion of the board or any interested party, enter a supplemental decree denying the right involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 659, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Service of Copy of Decree [2825. - 2826.]

2825.

The board shall furnish to each claimant whose rights are decreed a copy of the decree and a notice of the entry thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2826.

Upon entry of a supplemental decree establishing or modifying a right, the board shall furnish to each claimant who could be significantly affected, at his last known address, a copy of the supplemental decree and a notice of entry thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Expenses of Determination [2850. - 2868.]

2850.

At the time of the submission of proofs, the board shall collect from each claimant the fee established pursuant to Section 1528.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 87.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2851.

At the time of, or as soon as practicable after the mailing of, its order of determination the board shall compute the entire expense it has incurred in performing the duties prescribed in this chapter, including salaries, wages, traveling expenses, and all costs of whatever character which are properly chargeable to the proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2852.

If the total amount of expense exceeds the total amount received from claimants at the time of submission of proofs, the excess expense shall be equitably apportioned by the board against the parties to the proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2853.

A statement setting forth the expense and the apportionments thereof against the respective parties shall be sent by registered mail by the board to each of the parties and filed with the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2855.

Upon application in writing by any party aggrieved within 30 days after the statement of expense and the apportionment thereof has been mailed to the parties, the court shall after expiration of said period set for hearing the determination of any objections to the expense or to the apportionments thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 629.)
-------------------------------------------

2856.

The clerk of the court shall, at least 10 days prior to the date of hearing, give notice thereof by mail to all parties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2857.

If no objection is filed with the court within the prescribed periods the court upon ex parte application of the board shall enter a judgment against the parties in favor of the board in the amounts apportioned to them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 329.)
-------------------------------------------

2858.

Any party failing to object to the expense or the apportionments thereof waives all objections thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

2859.

Upon the hearing of objections to the expense or the apportionments thereof the court shall determine the expense and its apportionment as the court deems equitable and shall enter judgment against the parties in favor of the board in the amounts apportioned to them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 329.)
-------------------------------------------

2864.

If the funds available for use by the board are inadequate to enable it to undertake the expense of any proceeding under this chapter or if in its judgment reimbursement for the expense of any such proceeding is not reasonably certain, it may refuse to proceed with its investigation and to undertake the proceeding, unless and until such provision is made by persons interested as may be satisfactory to the board and deemed by it sufficient to secure reimbursement or payment to it for its expenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

2865.

During the pendency of any proceedings under this chapter, the board, after at least 20 days’ notice to the parties, may order interim or partial payments of the expense to be made by the parties as the board deems proper and equitable under the circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 88.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2868.

If a party fails to pay the expenses apportioned to that party when due, the board may refer the matter for collection of the unpaid expenses pursuant to Section 1536.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 89.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Modification of Decrees [2900. - 2900.]

2900.

In rendering its decree for the determination of rights to water, whether in suits referred to the board under the provisions of Chapter 1 of this part or in adjudications under the provisions of Chapter 3 of this part, the court may provide that the board or any party affected by the decree may, at any time within three years from entry thereof, apply to the court for a modification of the decree insofar only as the decree determines quantities of water, and after hearing the motion and any competent and admissible evidence offered in support of or against the motion the court may modify the decree by increasing or decreasing the quantities of water therein allowed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. DISTRIBUTION OF WATER IN WATERMASTER SERVICE AREAS [4000. - 4407.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [4000. - 4003.]

4000.

As used in this part, “service area” applies to watermaster districts heretofore established and to watermaster service areas hereafter established pursuant to this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4001.

As used in this part, “conduit” includes ditches, pipe lines, and other means of diversion.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4002.

Any duty or authority vested in a watermaster may be exercised by the watermaster directly or through the agency of a deputy watermaster, if there is one.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4003.

As used in this part, “fiscal year” means the year beginning July 1 of any calendar year and ending June 30 of the following calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Creation of Watermaster Service Areas [4025. - 4032.]

4025.

The department shall divide the State into watermaster service areas so constituted and adjusted as to insure the most practical and economical supervision of the distribution of water on the part of the State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4026.

Service areas shall be created from time to time as rights to water are ascertained and determined.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4027.

The rights may be ascertained and determined by any or all of the following:

(a) Under procedure provided for in this division;

(b) Under procedure provided by law, other than this division;

(c) By agreement in writing entered into by the respective claimants;

(d) By permits and licenses issued subsequent to any such adjudication or agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4028.

When rights are ascertained and determined by agreement, the agreement shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of each county in which is situated any water rights involved, and in the office of the county recorder of each county in which is situated the land, or any portion thereof, on which any water involved is, or is entitled to be, used.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4028.5.

When rights are ascertained and determined by court decree, certified copies of the decree shall be recorded as agreements are required to be recorded by Section 4028.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 375.)
-------------------------------------------

4029.

Upon the creation of a service area the department shall record in the office of the county recorder of each county in which a portion of the service area is situated a certified copy of the order creating the service area and a description by 40-acre subdivision or other smallest subdivisions of the public land surveys of all of the land within the service area which is within the county in which the description is recorded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

4030.

From time to time the department shall record supplemental or revised descriptions as the descriptions are changed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

4032.

Service areas may be enlarged, reduced, consolidated, or abolished from time to time as convenience of administration may require.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Watermasters [4050. - 4053.]

4050.

(a) Upon written request submitted to the department by the owners or governing bodies of at least 15 percent of the conduits lawfully entitled to directly divert water from the streams or other sources of water supply in any service area, the department may, if it determines that it is necessary, appoint a watermaster and if necessary, in its discretion, one or more deputy watermasters for the service area.

(b) Upon petition, made to a court in which a relevant judicial decree has been entered, by the owners or governing bodies of at least 15 percent of the conduits lawfully entitled to directly divert water from the streams or other sources of water supply in any service area, the court may appoint a public agency as watermaster under this part to replace the watermaster appointed by the department.

(c) (1) A watermaster appointed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall have the powers and duties prescribed by the court pursuant to the exercise of its judicial authority, which may include any powers and duties prescribed by this part.

(2) This part shall apply to the service area for which a watermaster is appointed pursuant to subdivision (b) only to the extent determined by the court.

(d) (1) If in response to a petition made to a court, the court appoints a watermaster in a service area in which the department previously appointed a watermaster, upon the appointment of the new watermaster becoming effective, the department shall not be responsible for carrying out any of the duties and obligations of this part, including any responsibility for the funding of the expenses of administration or distribution pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4200).

(2) If in response to a petition made to a court, the court appoints a watermaster in a service area in which the department previously appointed a watermaster, upon the appointment of the new watermaster becoming effective and in the discretion of the department, any fixed waterflow measuring device and fixed distribution structure installed by the department shall either be removed from the service area by the department, or transferred at no charge to the new watermaster appointed by the court. With respect to any waterflow measuring device or fixed distribution structure transferred to the new watermaster, all rights, duties, and obligations of the department shall accompany the transfer and shall be assumed by the new watermaster, and the new watermaster shall hold the department harmless for any and all claims or causes of action relative to the items transferred that arise subsequent to the transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 246, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4051.

The department may from time to time discontinue watermaster service in any service area, if necessity therefor ceases, and revive the service whenever and as frequently as necessity exists.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4052.

The watermaster shall be properly qualified and shall perform the duties imposed on him by this part as an employee under the general supervision and control of the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4053.

Watermasters, in addition to compensation for their services, shall receive necessary travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Construction and Maintenance of Works and Measuring Devices [4100. - 4126.]



  ARTICLE 1. By Owners of Conduits [4100. - 4104.]

4100.

The owner of every conduit subject to regulation by a watermaster shall construct and maintain to the satisfaction of the department a substantial and serviceable diversion dam or works in the channel of the stream from which the water is diverted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4101.

The owner of a conduit shall construct and maintain to the satisfaction of the department a substantial and serviceable headgate in the conduit through which the water is diverted at or near the diversion dam or works.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4102.

The headgate shall be of such construction that it can be locked and kept closed by the watermaster.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4103.

The owner of a conduit shall construct and maintain such water flow measuring devices at such points along the conduit as may be required and approved by the department for the purpose of assisting the watermaster in determining the amounts of water which are being diverted and applied to beneficial use.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4104.

If the owner of any conduit refuses or neglects to construct and maintain the diversion dam or works, the headgate, or the measuring devices provided for in this article after 30 days’ notice by the department so to do, the watermaster may close the conduit, and it shall not be opened or any water diverted from the source of supply until the requirements of the department as to the diversion dam or works, the headgate, or the measuring devices have been complied with.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. By Owners of Reservoirs [4125. - 4126.]

4125.

The owner of every reservoir which is subject to regulation by a watermaster and which is located across or upon the bed of a natural stream or requires the use of a natural stream channel shall construct and maintain such measuring devices below the reservoir in the stream and such measuring devices above the reservoir on each stream or source of supply discharging into the reservoir as may be required and approved by the department for the purpose of assisting the department or the watermaster in determining the amounts of water to which the owner is entitled and the amounts of water which the owner is diverting, storing, and applying to beneficial use.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4126.

If the owner of any reservoir neglects or refuses to construct and maintain the measuring devices provided for in this article after 30 days’ notice by the department, the watermaster may open the outlet of the reservoir and the outlet shall not be closed, except by order of the department, until the requirements of the department as to the measuring devices are complied with.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Distribution of Water in Service Areas [4150. - 4161.]



  ARTICLE 1. Procedure of Distribution [4150. - 4153.]

4150.

The department may make such reasonable regulations to secure distribution of water in accordance with determined rights as may be needed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4151.

The watermaster shall divide the water of the streams or other sources of supply among the several conduits and reservoirs taking water therefrom and so adjust or close the headgates of conduits and regulate the controlling works of reservoirs as may be necessary to insure a distribution of the water among the water users entitled to its use, according to the rights of the users.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4152.

Whenever in pursuance of his duties the watermaster regulates a headgate to a conduit or the controlling works of a reservoir, he may attach to the headgate or controlling works a written notice properly dated and signed setting forth the fact that the headgate or controlling works have been properly regulated and are wholly under his control.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4153.

The notice is legal notice to all persons interested in the diversion and distribution of the water of the conduit or reservoir.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Remedies for Improper Distribution [4160. - 4161.]

4160.

Any person who is injured by the action of any watermaster may apply to the superior court of the county in which the injury takes place, for an injunction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4161.

Such injunction shall be issued only in case it is shown at the hearing that the watermaster has failed to distribute the water according to the rights as determined by decrees of court, agreements, permits, or licenses as provided in this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Offenses [4175. - 4178.]

4175.

Every person who wilfully and without authority opens, closes, changes, or interferes with any headgate, waterbox, or measuring device while it is under the control of the wastermaster, or who wilfully takes or uses water which has been denied him by the watermaster under the provisions of this part is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4176.

The possession or use of water when it has been so denied him by the watermaster is prima facie evidence of the guilt of the person using it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4177.

Every person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter or of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 10 days nor more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 212.)
-------------------------------------------

4178.

A watermaster may arrest any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter or of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) and to deliver the person to the sheriff or other competent police officer within the county, and immediately thereafter file a complaint with a magistrate against the person so arrested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 213.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Expenses of Distribution [4200. - 4335.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [4200. - 4201.]

4200.

The department may incur such expense and make such expenditures as may be necessary to provide for the administration of any service area and the distribution of water therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4201.

All of the cost of administration of a service area and the distribution of water therein shall be paid by the owners of the rights to divert or store water within the service area as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 24.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Statement and Budget [4225. - 4228.]

4225.

The department shall, prior to June 15th of each year, prepare a statement for each service area. The statement shall contain a budget showing the amount of money estimated to be necessary to pay the costs of administration of the service area and the distribution of water therein for the ensuing fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

4226.

The budget shall include all of the following:

(a) Expenses theretofore incurred for the payment of which funds are not available.

(b) The cost of an annual watermaster report covering the current calendar year to be prepared at the end of said year.

(c) A reasonable estimate for contingencies.

(d) Other costs of administration of the service area or of distribution of water therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4227.

The statement shall also contain an apportionment of the amount of the budget among the owners of the various rights to store or divert within the service area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 25.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4228.

In all cases where a water right is owned by two or more persons, they shall pay in proportion to their respective interests in the water right, and, when the extent of the several interests is known to the department, the statement prepared by the department shall contain an apportionment of the amount to be paid by the various owners of the water right.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Apportionment of Expense [4251. - 4254.]

4251.

One-tenth of the budget for the service area shall be apportioned equally among the respective ownerships of all water rights involved, and except as otherwise provided in this article the remaining nine-tenths shall be apportioned among the ownerships of the respective water rights in accordance with the quantities of water that the owners of the respective water rights are entitled to store or divert within the service area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 27.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4252.

In all cases of rights to divert the direct flow of a stream, without storage, for power development or other nonconsumptive use, where the entire flow so diverted, with the exception of reasonable transportation losses, is returned to the same stream system above the next lower diversion, the owners of these rights shall share on account of these rights only in the equal apportionment of one-tenth of the budget for the service area, and shall not share in so far as these rights are concerned in the apportionment of the remaining nine-tenths.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 28.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4253.

In all cases where rights exist to store or divert water for use for more than one purpose, the amount to be paid by the owner of such rights shall be based upon the total amount of water he is entitled to store or divert, and he shall not be required to pay more than one amount on the same water so stored or diverted notwithstanding use for more than one purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4254.

In making an apportionment to any owner of the right to store water, 350 acre-feet of storage capacity which the owner is entitled to use shall be considered the equivalent of the right to divert one cubic foot per second of the direct flow of a stream.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Payment and Collection [4275. - 4279.]

4275.

Except as provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 4300), the department, on or before the 15th day of August of each year, shall certify, to the auditor and the board of supervisors of each county having a watermaster service area, or part of a watermaster service area, the amount required, in order to pay the apportionments for the ensuing fiscal year, to be levied on the land used in the storage or diversion, conveyance or distribution of the water stored or diverted under the right and the land on which the water is, or is entitled to be, used.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 282, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4276.

The auditor shall enter the amounts of the respective apportionments against the respective parcels of land as they appear on the current assessment roll. If any parcel is part of a larger parcel, the auditor may enter the apportionment against the larger parcel.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

4277.

The board of supervisors of each county in which there lies a watermaster service area or any portion thereof shall annually, and at the time of levying county taxes, levy on the land within the county and within the watermaster service area apportionments sufficient to raise the amounts certified by the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

4278.

Apportionments levied pursuant to this article shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes. So far as applicable, all provisions of law relating to the equalization, levy, payment, and collection of county taxes shall apply to such apportionments and all provisions of law relating to the duties of county officers in relation to county taxes shall apply to such apportionments, except as otherwise expressly provided by this chapter, so far as the same are or may be made applicable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

4279.

All money raised by such apportionments shall be accounted for separately as to each watermaster service area. All such money shall be transmitted by January 1 and July 1 of each year to the department for deposit in the Water Resources Revolving Fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Payment by and Collection From State Agencies and Public Entities [4300. - 4305.]

4300.

If the owner of the right is a county, municipality, district, political subdivision, public corporation, or state agency, or is public utility as defined in the Public Utilities Code, the department shall, on or before the 15th day of June of each year, serve each such owner named in the statement with a true copy thereof.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

4301.

Service on such owners may be made personally, or by mail as provided by Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

4302.

Each such owner shall, on or before the 10th day of December of the year in which the apportionment was made, pay to the department the amount apportioned to such owner. Unless payment is made on or before said date, payment shall become delinquent and 10 percent thereof shall be added thereto as a penalty for delinquency.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

4303.

If the owner of the right is a county, municipality, district, political subdivision, public corporation, or state agency, the amount apportioned, together with the penalty in case of delinquency, is a legal charge against the general fund thereof or such fund as may be provided for the maintenance and operation of its public works.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

4304.

If the owner of the right is a public utility as defined in the Public Utilities Code, the amount apportioned, together with the penalty in case of delinquency, is a lien against any money of the public utility.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------

4305.

At any time after 30 days after any payment due under this article becomes delinquent the department may institute in the name of the people of the State an action to compel payment of the charge against the owner and, in the case of a public utility, to foreclose the lien against any money of the public utility.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 360.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Alternative Method of Payment by Owners [4325. - 4335.]

4325.

The procedure set forth in this article for collecting and making available money for watermaster distribution is in lieu of that set forth in the other provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4326.

Whenever all the owners of rights to water within any service area, by agreement in writing, shall have organized themselves into an association for the purpose of financing the distribution of the water to which they are entitled and shall have agreed therein as to the apportionment of the expense and the payment thereof and shall have filed with the department a copy of the agreement duly certified and authenticated by the president and secretary of the association, the department shall thereafter submit the statement provided for in this chapter to the association.
